Georgia, session 2025_26, HB849.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act creating the Lower Chattahoochee Regional Airport Authority, approved
May 5, 2006 (Ga. L. 2006, p. 4422), as amended, particularly by an Act approved
May 28, 2010 (Ga. L. 2010 p. 3570) and an Act approved April 11, 2012
(Ga. L. 2012, p. 5050), is amended by revising Section 1 as follows:
"SECTION 1.
Short title.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the 'Randolph County Airport Authority Act.'"
H. B. 849
- 1 -

LC 62 0047/AP
SECTION 2.
Said Act is further amended by revising subsection (a) of Section 3 as follows:
"SECTION 3
Randolph County Airport Authority.
(a) There is created a body corporate and politic, to be known as the 'Randolph County
Airport Authority,' which shall be deemed to be a political subdivision of the State of
Georgia and a public corporation and by that name, style, and title said body may contract
and be contracted with, sue and be sued, implead and be impleaded, and bring and defend
actions in all courts. The authority shall have perpetual existence."
SECTION 3.
Said Act is further amended by revising paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Section 4 as
follows:
"(2) 'Authority' means the Randolph County Airport Authority created by this Act."
SECTION 4.
Said Act is further amended by revising Section 6 as follows:
"SECTION 6.
Successor to former airport authority.
The Randolph County Airport Authority shall be the successor in interest to the Lower
Chattahoochee Regional Airport Authority created by an Act approved May 5, 2006
(Ga. L. 2006, p. 4422), as amended, and shall by operation of law acquire and assume all
H. B. 849
- 2 -

LC 62 0047/AP
assets, interest, obligations, debts, and liabilities of the Lower Chattahoochee Regional
Airport Authority."
SECTION 5.
Said Act is further amended by revising Section 21 as follows:
"SECTION 21.
Validation.
Bonds of the authority shall be confirmed and validated in accordance with the procedure
of Article 3 of Chapter 82 of Title 36 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, known
as the 'Revenue Bond Law.' The petition for validation shall also make party defendant to
such action the State of Georgia or any municipality, county, authority, political
subdivision, or instrumentality of the State of Georgia which has contracted with the
authority for the services and facilities of the project for which bonds are to be issued and
sought to be validated, and the state or such municipality, county, authority, political
subdivision, or instrumentality shall be required to show cause, if any exists, why such
contract or contracts and the terms and conditions thereof should not be inquired into by
the court and the contract or contracts and the terms and conditions thereof should not be
inquired into by the court and the contract or contracts adjudicated as part of the basis for
the security for the payment of any such bonds of the authority. The bonds, when
validated, and the judgment of validation shall be final and conclusive with respect to such
bonds, and the security for the payment thereof and interest thereon and against the
authority issuing the same and the state and any municipality, county, authority, political
subdivision, or instrumentality, if a party to the validation proceedings, contracting with
the Randolph County Airport Authority."
H. B. 849
- 3 -

LC 62 0047/AP
SECTION 6.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 849
- 4 -